src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/numerals_gt-norm.yaml
  Num - lågenangáktsatuvsánaktatjuohtegålmmålåkguokta: # 
    lågenangáktsatuvsánaktatjuohtegålmmålåhkeguokta+Num+Sg+Nom: lågenangáktsatuvsánaaktatjuohtegålmmålåkguokta
    lågenangáktsatuvsánaktatjuohtegålmmålåhkeguokta+Num+Sg+Ela: lågenangáktsatuvsánaaktatjuohtegålmmålåkguovtes
    lågenangáktsatuvsánaktatjuohtegålmmålåhkeguokta+Num+Sg+Ill: lågenangáktsatuvsánaaktatjuohtegålmmålåkguoktaj
    lågenangáktsatuvsánaktatjuohtegålmmålåhkeguokta+Num+Sg+Par: lågenangáktsatuvsánaaktatjuohtegålmmålåkguovtet
    lågenangáktsatuvsánaktatjuohtegålmmålåhkeguokta+Num+Sg+Ine: lågenangáktsatuvsánaaktatjuohtegålmmålåkguovten
    lågenangáktsatuvsánaktatjuohtegålmmålåhkeguokta+Num+Pl+Ill: lågenangáktsatuvsánaaktatjuohtegålmmålåkguovtijda
    lågenangáktsatuvsánaktatjuohtegålmmålåhkeguokta+Num+Pl+Ela: lågenangáktsatuvsánaaktatjuohtegålmmålåkguovtijs
    lågenangáktsatuvsánaktatjuohtegålmmålåhkeguokta+Num+Ess: lågenangáktsatuvsánaaktatjuohtegålmmålåkguoktan

    
  Num - låhke: # 
    låhke+Num+Sg+Nom: [låhke, lågev]
    låhke+Num+Sg+Gen: låge
    låhke+Num+Sg+Acc: lågev
    låhke+Num+Sg+Ela: låges
    låhke+Num+Sg+Ill: låhkåj
    låhke+Num+Sg+Ine: lågen
    låhke+Num+Sg+Com: lågijn
    låhke+Num+Sg+Par: låget
    låhke+Num+Pl+Ill: lågijda
    låhke+Num+Pl+Ela: lågijs
    låhke+Num+Ess: låhken

  Num - tuvsán: # 
    tuvsán+Num+Sg+Nom: tuvsán
    tuvsán+Num+Sg+Gen: tuvsána
    tuvsán+Num+Sg+Acc: tuvsánav
    tuvsán+Num+Sg+Ela: tuvsánis
    tuvsán+Num+Sg+Ill: tuvsánij
    tuvsán+Num+Sg+Ine: tuvsánin
    tuvsán+Num+Sg+Com: tuvsánijn
    tuvsán+Num+Pl+Ill: tuvsánijda
    tuvsán+Num+Pl+Ela: tuvsánijs
    tuvsán+Num+Ess: tuvsánin

  Num - tjuohte: # 
    tjuohte+Num+Sg+Nom: tjuohte
    tjuohte+Num+Sg+Gen: tjuode
    tjuohte+Num+Sg+Acc: tjuohtev
    tjuohte+Num+Sg+Ine: tjuoden
    tjuohte+Num+Sg+Ela: tjuodes
    tjuohte+Num+Sg+Ill: tjuohtáj
    tjuohte+Num+Sg+Com: tjuodijn 
    tjuohte+Num+Sg+Par: tjuodet
    tjuohte+Num+Pl+Nom: tjuode
    tjuohte+Num+Pl+Gen: tjuodij
    tjuohte+Num+Pl+Acc: tjuodijt
    tjuohte+Num+Pl+Ine: tjuodijn
    tjuohte+Num+Pl+Ela: tjuodijs
    tjuohte+Num+Pl+Ill: tjuodijda
    tjuohte+Num+Pl+Com: tjuodij 
    tjuohte+Num+Ess: tjuohten

  Num - tjuohte: # 
    guoktatjuohte+Num+Sg+Nom: guoktatjuohte
    guoktatjuohte+Num+Sg+Gen: guoktatjuode
    guoktatjuohte+Num+Sg+Acc: guoktatjuodev
    guoktatjuohte+Num+Sg+Ine: guoktatjuoden
    guoktatjuohte+Num+Sg+Ela: guoktatjuodes
    guoktatjuohte+Num+Sg+Ill: guoktatjuohtáj
    guoktatjuohte+Num+Sg+Com: guoktatjuodijn 
    guoktatjuohte+Num+Sg+Par: guoktatjuodet
    guoktatjuohte+Num+Pl+Nom: guoktatjuode
    guoktatjuohte+Num+Pl+Gen: guoktatjuodij
    guoktatjuohte+Num+Pl+Acc: guoktatjuodijt
    guoktatjuohte+Num+Pl+Ine: guoktatjuodijn
    guoktatjuohte+Num+Pl+Ela: guoktatjuodijs
    guoktatjuohte+Num+Pl+Ill: guoktatjuodijda
    guoktatjuohte+Num+Pl+Com: guoktatjuodij 
    guoktatjuohte+Num+Ess: guoktatjuohten

  Num - millijárdda: # 
    millijárdda+Num+Sg+Nom: [millijárdda, miljárdda]
    millijárdda+Num+Sg+Gen: [millijárda, miljárda]
    millijárdda+Num+Sg+Acc: [millijárdav, miljárdav]
    millijárdda+Num+Sg+Ela: [millijárdas, miljárdas]
    millijárdda+Num+Sg+Ill: [millijárddaj, miljárddaj]
    millijárdda+Num+Sg+Ine: [millijárdan, miljárdan]
    millijárdda+Num+Sg+Com: [millijárdajn, miljárdajn]
    millijárdda+Num+Sg+Par: [millijárdat, miljárdat]
    millijárdda+Num+Pl+Ill: [millijárdajda, miljárdajda]
    millijárdda+Num+Pl+Ela: [millijárdajs, miljárdajs]
    millijárdda+Num+Ess: [millijárddan, miljárddan]
    millijárdda+Num+Der/akti+Adv: [millijárddi, miljárddi]

  Num - millijåvnnå: # 
    millijåvnnå+Num+Sg+Nom: [millijåvnnå, miljåvnnå]
    millijåvnnå+Num+Sg+Gen: [millijåvnå, miljåvnå]
    millijåvnnå+Num+Sg+Acc: [millijåvnåv, miljåvnåv]
    millijåvnnå+Num+Sg+Ela: [millijåvnås, miljåvnås]
    millijåvnnå+Num+Sg+Ine: [millijåvnån, miljåvnån]
    millijåvnnå+Num+Sg+Ill: [millijåvnnåj, miljåvnnåj]
    millijåvnnå+Num+Sg+Com: [millijåvnåjn, miljåvnåjn]
    millijåvnnå+Num+Sg+Par: [millijåvnåt, miljåvnåt]
    millijåvnnå+Num+Pl+Ill: [millijåvnåjda, miljåvnåjda]
    millijåvnnå+Num+Pl+Ela: [millijåvnåjs, miljåvnåjs]
    millijåvnnå+Num+Ess: [millijåvnnån, miljåvnnån]   
    millijåvnnå+Num+Der/akti+Adv: [millijåvnni, miljåvnni]

  Noun - nubbe: #2TO9F 
    nubbe+A+Ord+Sg+Nom: nubbe 
    nubbe+A+Ord+Sg+Ill: nubbáj 
    nubbe+A+Ord+Sg+Ela: nuppes        
    nubbe+A+Ord+Ess: nubben                
    nuppát+A+Ord+Sg+Gen: nuppáda  
      
  Noun - lågenanguokta: #LÅGENAN
    lågenanguokta+Num+Sg+Ill: lågenanguoktaj
